Utah statutes.
78B-6-108.   Alien child -- Evidence of lawful admission to United States required.

(1)  As used in this section, "alien child" means a child under 16 years of age who is not considered a citizen or national of the United States by the United States Immigration and Naturalization Service.

(2)  Any person adopting an alien child shall file with the petition for adoption written evidence from the United States Immigration and Naturalization Service that the child was inspected and:

(a)  admitted into the United States for permanent residence;

(b)  admitted into the United States temporarily in one of the lawful nonimmigrant categories specified in 8 U.S.C. Section 1101(a)(15); or

(c)  paroled into the United States pursuant to 8 U.S.C. Section 1182(d)(5).

(3)  The 1992 amendments to this section are retroactive to September 1, 1984.  Any adoption decree entered after September 1, 1984, is considered valid if the requirements of Subsection (2), as amended, were met.

